Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6264.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "data center energy standards act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Clean energy" means that term as defined in section 3 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1003. (b) "Commission" means the Michigan public service commission created in section 1 of 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.1. (c) "Data center" means a facility in this state that is composed of 1 or more buildings and that is designed and intended for housing, and does house, data center equipment to centralize the storage and processing of data. (d) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (e) "Renewable energy" means that term as defined in section 11 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1011. Sec. 5. (1) By not later than January 1, 2040, the owner or operator of a data center shall procure clean energy or renewable energy for the data center equivalent to 100% of the data center's energy use on an annual basis. (2) The clean energy or renewable energy required under subsection (1) may be procured through on-site generation, power purchase agreements, or other energy instruments, credits, or contracts that are approved by the commission under subsection (3). (3) The owner or operator of a data center may submit a proposed instrument, credit, or contract to the commission for approval. The commission shall approve the proposed instrument, credit, or contract if the commission determines that the energy procured through the instrument, credit, or contract will be clean energy or renewable energy. Sec. 7. A person that violates section 5 is subject to a civil fine of not more than $10,000.00 for each day the violation occurs or the failure to comply continues. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the civil fine. In an action brought under this section, the court must consider a recommendation made by the commission regarding whether the violation occurred or continued for a specified number of days. A civil fine collected under this section must be deposited in the general fund. Sec. 9. The commission may promulgate rules to implement this act under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 6135. (b) House Bill No. 6136. (c) House Bill No. 6137. (d) House Bill No. 6138. (e) House Bill No. 6139. (f) House Bill No. 6140. (g) House Bill No. 6141. (h) House Bill No. 6142.